Utah statutes.
78B-14-401.   Petition to establish support order.

(1)  If a support order entitled to recognition under this chapter has not been issued, a responding tribunal of this state may issue a support order if:

(a)  the individual seeking the order resides in another state; or

(b)  the support-enforcement agency seeking the order is located in another state.

(2)  The tribunal may issue a temporary child-support order if the tribunal determines that an order is appropriate and the individual ordered to pay is:

(a)  a presumed father of the child;

(b)  petitioning to have his paternity adjudicated;

(c)  identified as the father of the child through genetic testing;

(d)  an alleged father who has declined to submit to genetic testing;

(e)  shown by clear and convincing evidence to be the father of the child;

(f)  an acknowledged father determined in accordance with Title 78B, Chapter 15, Part 3, Voluntary Declaration of Paternity Act;

(g)  the mother of the child; or

(h)  an individual who has been ordered to pay child-support in a previous proceeding and the order has not been reversed or vacated.

(3)  Upon finding, after notice and opportunity to be heard, that an obligor owes a duty of support, the tribunal shall issue a support order directed to the obligor and may issue other orders pursuant to Section 78B-14-305.

